District of Columbia statutes.
7-2071.10

Requirements for health benefits plans and HealthCare Alliance.

(a)

Health benefits plans and the HealthCare Alliance shall:

(1)

Include in their marketing and membership materials information regarding the availability of the Ombudsman Program;

(2)

Send annually to their members notification of the availability of the Ombudsman Program; and

(3)

Provide members the telephone number of the Ombudsman Program upon request.

(b)

A health benefits plan may use the one-page, easy-to-read flyer developed by the Ombudsman Program to describe its services to meet the notice requirements under subsection (a)(1) and (2) of this section.

History

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-331, § 11, 52 DCR 1981